Utah statutes.
53A-13-205.   Promoting the establishment and maintenance of classes -- Payment of costs.

(1)  The superintendent of public instruction shall promote the establishment and maintenance of driver education classes in school districts under rules adopted by the State Board of Education.

(2)  The state board may employ personnel and sponsor experimental programs considered necessary to give full effect to this program.

(3)  The costs of implementing this section shall be paid from the legislative appropriation to the board made from the Automobile Driver Education Tax Account in the Uniform School Fund.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

